Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1610
Insurer, defined.

Insurer shall mean an insurer as defined in section 44-103 which holds a certificate of authority to transact the business of insurance in this state.

Laws 1991, LB 167, § 10.